Hawaii statutes.
§805-1 Complaint; form of warrant.
When a complaint is made to any prosecuting officer of the commission of any
offense, the prosecuting officer shall examine the complainant, shall reduce
the substance of the complaint to writing, and shall cause the complaint to be
subscribed by the complainant under oath, which the prosecuting officer is
hereby authorized to administer, or the complaint shall be made by declaration
in accordance with the rules of court. If the original complaint results from
the issuance of a traffic summons or a citation in lieu of an arrest pursuant
to section 803-6, by a police officer, the oath may be administered by any
police officer whose name has been submitted to the prosecuting officer and who
has been designated by the chief of police to administer the oath, or the
complaint may be submitted by declaration in accordance with the rules of
court. Upon presentation of the written complaint to the judge in whose
circuit the offense allegedly has been committed, the judge shall issue a
warrant, reciting the complaint and requiring the sheriff, or other officer to
whom it is directed, except as provided in section 805-3, to arrest the accused
and to bring the accused before the judge to be dealt with according to law;
and in the same warrant the judge may require the officer to summon such
witnesses as are named in the warrant to appear and give evidence at the
trial. The warrant may be in the form established by the usage and practice of
the issuing court. [L 1892, c 57, §18; RL 1925, §4007; RL 1935, §5470; am L
1941, c 64, §1; RL 1945, §10770; RL 1955, §257-1; am L 1959, c 184, §1; am L
1963, c 85, §3; HRS §710-1; am L 1970, c 188, §36; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1;
am L 1978, c 227, §1; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; gen ch
1993; am L 1998, c 36, §3; am L 2007, c 13, §2]

Rules of Court

Application for arrest warrant, see HRPP rule 3.

Obtaining the appearance of defendant, see HRPP rule 9.

Case Notes

See 49 H. 404, 420 P.2d 100 (1966).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next